Utah statutes.
76-8-101.   Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)  "Candidate for electoral office" means a person who has filed as a candidate for office under the laws of the state.

(2)  "Party official" means any person holding any post in a political party whether by election, appointment, or otherwise.

(3)  "Peace officer" means any employee of a police or law enforcement agency that is part of or administered by the state or any of its political subdivisions, and whose duties consist primarily of the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of criminal statutes or ordinances of this state or any of its political subdivisions.

(4) (a)  "Pecuniary benefit" means any advantage in the form of money, property, commercial interest, or anything else, the primary significance of which is economic gain.

(b)  "Pecuniary benefit" does not include economic advantage applicable to the public generally, such as tax reduction or increased prosperity generally.

(5) (a)  "Public servant" means any officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state, including judges, legislators, consultants, and persons otherwise performing a governmental function.

(b)  A person is considered a public servant upon his election, appointment, or other designation as such, although he may not yet officially occupy that position.



Amended by Chapter 42, 1993 General Session

